Maine, session 132, LD1826.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §25012 is enacted to read:
§25012. Confidentiality
Personally identifiable information obtained in furtherance of the commission's duties
pursuant to section 25007, subsection 1, paragraph A is confidential, except that the
executive director may authorize disclosure of personally identifiable information if the
executive director has obtained the consent of the individual to whom the personally
identifiable information applies. "Personally identifiable information" includes, but is not
limited to, name, address, date of birth, e-mail address, Internet protocol address and any
other information that permits the identity of an individual to whom the information applies
to be able to be reasonably inferred or known by either direct or indirect means.
Notwithstanding section 95-C, subsection 1, paragraph C, personally identifiable
information made confidential under this section must remain confidential until the relevant
records have been in existence for 100 years.
Page 1 - 132LR2466(03)